Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-329
Taxation; real estate.

The real estate of such associations shall be subject to taxation in the same manner as provided by law in the case of other corporations and individuals.

Laws 1899, c. 17, § 14, p. 91;

R.S.1913, § 498;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XIX, § 14, p. 730;

C.S.1922, § 8096;

C.S.1929, § 8-314;

R.S.1943, § 8-329;

Laws 1959, c. 22, § 1, p. 152;

Laws 1971, LB 3, § 1.